District of Columbia statutes.
7-104

Sanitary Inspectors — Reports.

Said Inspectors shall be respectively required to make, at least once in 2 weeks, a report to said Director of the Department of Human Services, in writing, of their inspections, which shall be preserved on file.

History

June 11, 1878, 20 Stat. 107, ch. 180, § 9
Aug. 1, 1950, 64 Stat. 393, ch. 513, § 1
Mar. 2, 2007, D.C. Law 16-191, § 6(a), 53 DCR 6794

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 6-104.
1973 Ed., § 6-105.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 16-191 validated a previously made technical correction.

Editor's Notes

Office of Director of Public Health abolished: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 7-101.